test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-wtmlo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Numeral - õtmlo : # Numeral 'eleven/yksitoista' - full paradigm
     õtmlo+Num+Sg+Nom: õtmlo
     õtmlo+Num+Sg+Gen: õtmlååi
     õtmlo+Num+Sg+Acc: õtmlååi
     õtmlo+Num+Sg+Ill: õtmlåkka
     õtmlo+Num+Sg+Loc: õtmlååʹjjest
     õtmlo+Num+Sg+Com: õtmlooʹjjin
     õtmlo+Num+Ess: õtmlååʹǩǩen
     õtmlo+Num+Par: õtmlååʹǩǩed
     õtmlo+Num+Sg+Abe: [õtmlååitaa, õtmlååitää]
     õtmlo+Num+Pl+Nom: õtmlååi
     õtmlo+Num+Pl+Gen: õtmlooʹjji
     õtmlo+Num+Pl+Acc: õtmlooʹjjid
     õtmlo+Num+Pl+Ill: õtmlooʹjjid
     õtmlo+Num+Pl+Loc: õtmlooʹjjin
     õtmlo+Num+Pl+Com: õtmlooʹjjivuiʹm
     õtmlo+Num+Pl+Abe: [õtmlooʹjjitaa, õtmlooʹjjitää]
